Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.051

Nonjudicial transfer of trust assets or administration—Notice—Consent required.

(1) The trustee may transfer trust situs (a) in accordance with RCW 11.96A.220; or (b) by giving written notice to the attorney general in the case of a charitable trust subject to chapter 11.110 RCW and to the qualified beneficiaries not less than sixty days before initiating the transfer. The notice must:

(a) State the name and mailing address of the trustee;

(b) Include a copy of the governing instrument of the trust;

(c) Include a statement of assets and liabilities of the trust dated within ninety days of the notice;

(d) State the name and mailing address of the trustee to whom the trust will be transferred together with evidence that the trustee has agreed to accept the trust in the manner provided by law of the new situs. The notice must also contain a statement of the trustee's qualifications and the name of the court, if any, having jurisdiction of that trustee or in which a proceeding with respect to the administration of the trust may be heard;

(e) State the facts supporting the requirements of RCW 11.98.045(2);

(f) Advise the recipients of the notice of the date, not less than sixty days after the giving of the notice, by which such recipients must notify the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer; and

(g) Include a form on which the recipient may object to the proposed transfer.

(2) If the date upon which the right to object to the transfer expires without receipt by the trustee of any objection, the trustee may transfer the trust situs as provided in the notice. If the trust was registered under RCW 11.98.045(2), the trustee must file a notice of transfer of situs and termination of registration with the court of the county where the trust was registered.

(3) The authority of a trustee under this section to transfer a trust's situs terminates if a recipient of the notice notifies the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer on or before the date specified in the notice.

(4) A change of trust situs does not authorize a change of trustee. Change of trustee of a trust requires compliance with RCW 11.98.039.

[ 2013 c 272 s 15; 2011 c 327 s 24; 1999 c 42 s 619; 1985 c 30 s 46. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 75.]

NOTES:

Application—2013 c 272: See note following RCW 11.98.002.

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.